Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5708.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 17-9.1 of the General Laws entitled "Registration of Voters" is
hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
17-9.1-7.1. Department of environmental management -- Registration to vote.
(a) Every person applying for a hunting or fishing license or a renewal of either of those
licenses and who is or may be by the next general election qualified to vote, shall be registered to
vote, or if previously registered, be afforded the opportunity to change their address for voting
purposes.
(b) The application to register to vote shall be offered simultaneously with the application
for a hunting or fishing license or a license renewal. Department of environmental management
employees shall provide to applicants for hunting and fishing licenses or their renewal, the same
level of assistance and instruction with respect to the application to register to vote, as is provided
with respect to the application for hunting and fishing licenses, or renewal of either of those
licenses; provided, that one signature may be sufficient on the application for the hunting or fishing
license, or renewal of either of those licenses and the application to register to vote. The applicant
shall be afforded the opportunity to decline to register to vote. If previously registered, the applicant
shall be afforded the opportunity to change the applicant's address for voting purposes. In order to
protect the privacy of those who decline to register to vote for any reason, the failure of an applicant
to qualify for a hunting or fishing license may not be used for any purposes other than to determine
the person’s voter registration status.

(c)(1) The voter registration application shall contain the registrant’s name, residence
address, mailing address if different from residence address, date of birth, and registrant’s signature
and date of affixation of signature, and may include any other information, certifications, and
declarations, including those made under the penalty of perjury, that may be required by the state
board of elections in order to administer a single and unified system of voter registration, in
accordance with applicable state and federal laws that enable duly registered voters to vote in all
elections in their respective voting districts including, elections for federal officers. The voter
registration application shall also include, in print identical to that used in the attestation portion of
the form, the following:
(i) The penalties provided by law for submitting a false voter registration;
(ii) A statement that, if the applicant declines to register to vote, the applicant's decision
shall remain confidential and be used only for voter registration purposes; and
(iii) A statement that, if the applicant does register to vote, information regarding purchase
of a hunting or fishing license and the location where the license was required shall remain
confidential, to be used only for voter registration purposes.
(2) It shall be the responsibility of the department of environmental management to print
and to have available at all times a sufficient number of voter registration forms necessary to carry
out the provisions of this section.
(d) The completed voter registration application shall be transmitted by the department of
environmental management to the central voter registration system mandated pursuant to § 17-6-
1.2, not later than the next business day after the date of acceptance by the department of
environmental management. Transmission shall be made by electronic means, as prescribed by the
secretary of state, and shall be in an electronic form compatible with the voter registration system
maintained by the secretary of state.
(e) Any person who has fully and correctly completed an application to register to vote
while purchasing a hunting or fishing license shall be presumed to be registered as of the date of
the acceptance of the registration by the department of environmental management, subject to
verification of the registration by the local board, as provided in § 17-9.1-25.
(f) Pursuant to § 17-9.1-11, the department of environmental management shall not
transmit the voter registration of any applicant, who fails to certify that they are a citizen of the
United States.
(g) If a person who is ineligible to vote becomes registered to vote pursuant to this section,
that person’s registration shall be presumed to be deemed officially authorized and not be deemed
attributable to or the fault of that person. Notwithstanding the foregoing, anyone who knowingly
LC001548 - Page 2 of 4

and willfully provides false information pursuant to this section shall be subject to prosecution
under § 17-9.1-12.
(h) The state board of elections shall have the authority to adopt regulations to implement
and administer the provisions of this section, including all registrations completed in conjunction
with the purchase of a hunting or fishing license.
(i)(1) In accordance with Section 7 of the National Voter Registration Act of 1993, 52
U.S.C. § 20506, other applicable state government agencies that the secretary verifies already
collect documents that would provide proof of eligibility, including age, citizenship, and residence
address, may follow the procedures for automatic voter registration enumerated for the department
of environmental management, as described in subsections (b) through (d) of this section.
(2) Any additional agencies that are designated for automatic voter registration shall follow
the rules and protocols established in this section for the department of environmental management.
(j) Effective date. The provisions of this section shall take effect ninety (90) days after the
director of the department of environmental management certifies in writing to the general
assembly, that the department of environmental management's computer system is capable of
meeting the requirements set forth in this chapter. The director of the department of environmental
management shall consult with the secretary of state prior to making this determination about the
computer system.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001548
========
LC001548 - Page 3 of 4